es: Material del hisopo: Algodón; Fieltro; Microfibra; Papel; Plástico; Seda; Lana; Otros
ko: 면봉 소재: 면; 펠트; 극세사; 종이; 플라스틱; 실크; 울; 기타
tr: Sürüntü malzemesi: Pamuk; Keçe; Mikrofiber; Kağıt; Plastik; İpek; Yünlüler; Diğer
ja: 綿棒材質: コットン; フェルト; マイクロファイバー; 紙; プラスチック; シルク; ウール; その他
ro-RO: Material tampon: Bumbac; Pâslă; Microfibră; Hârtie; Plastic; Mătase; Lână; Altele
zh-CN: 拭子材质: 棉布; 毛毡; 超细纤维; 纸张; 塑料; 丝绸; 羊毛; 其他
nb: Vattpinnemateriale: Bomull; Filt; Mikrofiber; Papir; Plast; Silke; Ull; Annet
zh-TW: 棉花棒材質: 棉布; 毛氈; 超細纖維; 紙; 塑膠; 絲綢; 羊毛; 其他
el: Υλικό μπατονέτας: Βαμβάκι; Τσόχα; Μικροΐνες; Χαρτί; Πλαστικό; Μετάξι; Μαλλί; Άλλο
vi: Vật liệu gạc: Vải bông; Nỉ; Vải xơ vi mảnh; Giấy; Nhựa; Lụa; Len; Khác
de: Tupfermaterial: Baumwolle; Filz; Mikrofaser; Papier; Kunststoff; Seide; Wolle; Sonstiges
cs: Materiál stěrky: Bavlna; Plst; Mikrovlákno; Papír; Plast; Hedvábí; Vlna; Jiné
fr: Matériau de l’écouvillon: Coton; Feutre; Microfibre; Papier; Plastique; Soie; Laine; Autre
ru: Материал салфетки: Хлопок; Фетр; Микрофибра; Бумага; Пластик; Шелк; Шерсть; Другое
fi: Vanupuikkomateriaali: Puuvilla; Huopa; Mikrokuitu; Paperi; Muovi; Silkki; Villa; Muu
sl-SI: Material čistilne palčke: Bombaž; Filc; Mikrovlakna; Papir; Plastika; Svila; Volna; Drugo
bg-BG: Материал за тампон: Памук; Филц; Микрофибър; Хартия; Пластмаса; Коприна; Вълна; Други
lt-LT: Valymo tampono medžiaga: Medvilnė; Veltinis; Mikropluoštas; Popierius; Plastikas; Šilkas; Vilna; Kita
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำเครื่องเช็ดล้าง: สำลี; ผ้าสักหลาด; ไมโครไฟเบอร์; กระดาษ; พลาสติก; ผ้าไหม; ผ้าขนสัตว์; อื่นๆ
en: Swab material: Cotton; Felt; Microfiber; Paper; Plastic; Silk; Wool; Other
nl: Materiaal wattenstaafje: Katoen; Vilt; Microvezel; Papier; Plastic; Zijde; Wol; Andere
pt-PT: Material da cotonete: Algodão; Feltro; Microfibra; Papel; Plástico; Seda; Lã; Outro
sv: Svabb - material: Bomull; Filt; Mikrofiber; Papper; Plast; Silke; Ylle; Övrigt
hu: Tisztítókendő anyaga: Pamut; Filc; Mikroszálas; Papír; Műanyag; Selyem; Gyapjú; Egyéb
sk-SK: Materiál tampónu: Bavlna; Plsť; Mikrovlákno; Papier; Plast; Hodvábny; Vlna; Iné
da: Swabmateriale: Bomuld; Filt; Mikrofiber; Papir; Plast; Silke; Uld; Andet
pl: Materiał wymazówki: Bawełna; Filc; Mikrofibra; Papier; Tworzywo sztuczne; Jedwab; Wełna; Inne
it: Materiale del tampone: Cotone; Feltro; Microfibra; Carta; Plastica; Seta; Lana; Altro
pt-BR: Material do cotonete: Algodão; Sentido; Microfibra; Papel; Plástico; Seda; Lã; Outro
hr-HR: Materijal štapića za čišćenje: Pamuk; Filc; Mikrovlakna; Papir; Plastika; Svila; Vuna; Ostalo